Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1566.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds provided in the form of a government grant to a nonprofit organization, unless the
government grant is issued for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or
painting;
(B) Building and development permit fees paid or waived by the public agency;
(C) Tax credits or tax abatements;
(D) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
(E) The difference between:
(i) The value of land that a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time of
the sale after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or other
limitation, exclusive of zoning or land use regulations, that the public agency imposes on the de-
velopment or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if the land is not subject to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
(F) Staff resources of the public agency used to manage a project or to provide a principal
source of supervision, coordination or oversight of a project;
(G) Staff resources of the public agency used to design or inspect one or more components of
a project;
(H) Any loan from a public agency to a private entity, including moneys derived from the
sale of bonds that [are loaned by] a state agency lends to a private entity[, unless the moneys will
be used for a public improvement];
(I) Value added to land as a consequence of a public agency’s site preparation, demolition of real
property, [or] remediation or removal of environmental contamination, or provision of
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 31

SB 1566
infrastructure that includes but is not limited to road construction or utilities, except for
value added in excess of the expenses the public agency incurred in the site preparation,
demolition, [or] remediation or removal or provision of infrastructure when the land is sold for
use in a project otherwise subject to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870; or
(J) Bonds, or loans from the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289 or
ORS 441.525 to 441.595[, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement].
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations described in sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
(a) [Projects] A project in Clackamas, Lane, Marion, Multnomah, Polk, Washington or
Yamhill counties for which the contract price does not exceed $50,000 or a project elsewhere
within this state for which the contract price does not exceed $250,000. In determining the
price of a project, a public agency:
(A) May not include the value of donated materials or work performed on the project by indi-
viduals volunteering to the public agency without pay; and
(B) Shall include the value of work performed by every person paid by a contractor or subcon-
tractor in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
(b) [Projects] A project for which no funds of a public agency are directly or indirectly used.
In accordance with ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall
adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this paragraph.
(c) [Projects] A project:
(A) That [are] is privately owned;
(B) That [use] uses funds of a private entity;
(C) In which a public agency will occupy or use less than 25 percent of the square footage
of [a] the completed project [will be occupied or used by a public agency]; and
(D) [For which] That uses less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency [are used].
[(d) Projects for residential construction that are privately owned and that predominantly provide
affordable housing. As used in this paragraph:]
[(A) “Affordable housing” means housing that serves occupants whose incomes are no greater than
60 percent of the area median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes are no greater
than 80 percent of the area median income.]
[(B) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more.]
[(C) “Privately owned” includes:]
[(i) Affordable housing provided on real property owned by a public agency if the real property
and related structures are leased to a private entity for 50 or more years; and]
[(ii) Affordable housing owned by a partnership, nonprofit corporation or limited liability company
in which a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner, director or managing
member and the housing authority is not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit corporation
or limited liability company.]
[(D) “Residential construction” includes the construction, reconstruction, major renovation or
painting of single-family houses or apartment buildings not more than four stories in height and all
incidental items, such as site work, parking areas, utilities, streets and sidewalks, pursuant to the
United States Department of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard
of Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon and Related Acts,” dated March
[2]

SB 1566
17, 1978. However, the commissioner may consider different definitions of residential construction in
determining whether a project is a residential construction project for purposes of this paragraph, in-
cluding definitions that:]
[(i) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or]
[(ii) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade or occupation, from the United States
Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.]
(d) A privately owned project that is constructed, reconstructed or renovated for resi-
dential use and in which 60 percent or more of the dwelling units are affordable housing:
(A) If the project meets the following criteria, as appropriate for the project:
(i) The project is:
(I) Privately owned in fee simple;
(II) Land, or land and improvements, that are leased from a public agency for 50 years
or more; or
(III) Owned by a partnership, nonprofit corporation or limited liability company in which
a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner, director or managing
member and the housing authority is not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
(ii) The project is housing that:
(I) The state acquires, constructs, remodels, repairs, equips or furnishes and owns or
operates with funding provided under ORS 458.480 to 458.490;
(II) Serves occupants whose incomes do not exceed 120 percent of the area median in-
come if the housing is a public works or uses funds of a public agency in an amount that
exceeds $750,000, as adjusted annually by the commissioner in accordance with the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor;
(III) Requires, for the purpose of serving occupants whose incomes do not exceed 120
percent of the area median income, demolition or removal of hazardous waste that uses
$750,000 or more in funds of a public agency and that occurs on real property that a state
agency owns but that does not involve constructing, reconstructing, renovating or painting
a road, highway, building, structure or improvement;
(IV) Serves occupants whose incomes do not exceed 60 percent of the area median in-
come if the project involves construction, reconstruction, painting, demolition, removal of
hazardous waste from, or major renovation of an improvement that occurs, with or without
using funds of a public agency, on real property that a public university listed in ORS 352.002
owns; or
(V) Otherwise serves occupants whose incomes do not exceed 60 percent of the area
median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes do not exceed 80 percent of
the area median income.
(B) If the project constructs, reconstructs, performs a major renovation of or paints
single-family houses or apartments, together with incidental items such as site work, park-
ing areas, utilities and streets and sidewalks, that, except as provided in subparagraph (C)
of this paragraph:
(i) In Clackamas, Lane, Marion, Multnomah, Polk, Washington or Yamhill counties are
not more than seven stories in height; and
(ii) In all other areas of the state are not more than four stories in height and are con-
[3]

SB 1566
structed, reconstructed, renovated or painted in accordance with the United States Depart-
ment of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard of
Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon and Related Acts,” dated
March 17, 1978.
(C) If the project is residential construction under a definition that the commissioner
adopts after considering definitions that:
(i) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or
(ii) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade or occupation, from the United
States Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
(D) Even if the project includes any of the following elements:
(i) An on-site child care facility operated as a not-for-profit enterprise.
(ii) Commercial use in not more than 15 percent of the available ground floor space in
the project.
(E) Even if the project was previously used or occupied for a purpose other than resi-
dential use.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to
procurements that a contracting agency advertises or otherwise solicits or, if the contract-
ing agency does not advertise or solicit the procurement, to a contract for public works or
public improvement contract into which the contracting agency enters on or after the oper-
ative date specified in section 3 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 1 of this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Attorney General, the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, the
Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Director of Transporta-
tion and a contracting agency that adopts rules under ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may adopt
rules and take any other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary to enable the Attorney General, the commissioner, the directors
and the contracting agency to undertake and exercise, on and after the operative date spec-
ified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the
Attorney General, the commissioner, the directors and the contracting agency by the
amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[4]